North Dakota, session 69, HB1471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 26.1-47 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Method of dental payment option.
1. A preferred provider arrangement may not include restrictions on methods of payment from
the dental insurer or third-party payor vendor to the dental provider in which the only
acceptable payment method is a credit card payment.
2. If initiating or changing payments to a dental provider using electronic funds transfer
payments, including virtual credit card payments, a dental insurer or the contracted vendor
shall:
a. Notify the dental provider if any fees are associated with a particular payment method;
b. Advise the dental provider of the available methods of payment and provide clear
instructions to the dental provider as to how to select an alternative payment method that
does not impose fees or similar charges on the provider; and
c. Notify the dental provider if the dental insurer is sharing a part of the profit of the fee
charged by the credit card company to pay the claim.
3. A dental provider or a contracted vendor, which initiates or changes payments to a dental
provider through the automated clearinghouse network, under title 45, Code of Federa l
Regulations, sections 162.1601 and 162.1602, may not charge a fee solely to transmit the
payment to a dental provider unless the dental provider has consented to the fee. A dental
provider's agent may charge reasonable fees if transmitting an automated clearinghouse
network payment related to transaction management, data management, portal services, and
other value-added services in addition to the bank transmittal.
4. As used in this section, "dental insurer" and "dental provider" have the same meaning as in
section 26.1 - 36.9 - 01 .

H. B. NO. 1471 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1471.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State